Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201813-2112
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out the Enterprise Zone Act.
The department shall update such rules and regulations within six months after
July 18, 2014.

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB800, § 4.